Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.081

Licensure of town, city, or county employees conducting real estate transactions.

Persons licensed under this chapter who are employed by a town, city, or county, and who are conducting real estate transactions on behalf of the town, city, or county, may hold active licenses under this chapter, and their designated and managing brokers are not responsible for their real estate transactions on behalf of their town, city, or county employer.

[ 2008 c 23 s 5; 1987 c 514 s 2. Formerly RCW 18.85.055.]